Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-511
Sections, how construed.

Sections 18-501 to 18-512 shall be construed as independent, supplemental, and in addition to any other laws of the State of Nebraska relating to sewage disposal plants and sewerage systems in cities and villages. Such sections shall not be considered amendatory of or limited by any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1951, c. 19, § 7, p. 101;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 64, p. 312;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 41.